Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-280
Property conveyed to Lower Loup Natural
Resources District; operation and maintenance.

(1) Property conveyed by the Game and Parks
Commission pursuant to section 90-279 shall be operated and maintained as
follows:

(a) The property shall be
maintained so as to appear attractive and inviting to the public;

(b) Sanitation and sanitary
facilities shall be maintained in accordance with applicable health standards;

(c) The property shall be
kept reasonably open, accessible, and safe for public use. Fire prevention
and similar activities shall be maintained for proper public safety;

(d) Buildings, roads, trails,
and other structures and improvements shall be kept in reasonable repair throughout
their estimated lifetime to prevent undue deterioration and to encourage public
use, including the maintenance of the area's federally funded public boating
access facilities existing on the property, which is specially assigned and
required through 2024; and

(e)
The facility shall be kept open for public use at reasonable hours and times
of the year, according to the type of area or facility.

(2) The Lower Loup Natural
Resources District shall be responsible for compliance and enforcement of
the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 2012, LB849, § 2.